en: Comb material: ABS; Acrylic; Aluminum; Bamboo; Brass; Maple wood; Pearwood; Polycarbonate; Resin; Stainless steel; Other
nl: Kammateriaal: ABS; Acryl; Aluminium; Bamboe; Messing; Esdoornhout; Perenhout; Polycarbonaat; Hars; Roestvrij staal; Overige
sk-SK: Materiál hrebeňa: ABS; Akryl; Hliník; Bambus; Mosadz; Javorové drevo; Hruškové drevo; Polykarbonát; Živica; Nehrdzavejúca oceľ; Iné
tr: Tarak stili: ABS; Akrilik; Alüminyum; Bambu; Pirinç; Akçaağaç; Armut ağacı; polikarbonat; Reçine; Paslanmaz çelik; Diğer
pt-PT: Material do pente: ABS; Acrílico; Alumínio; Bambu; Latão; Madeira de ácer; Madeira de pereira; Policarbonato; Resina; Aço inoxidável; Outro
de: Kammmaterial: ABS; Acryl; Aluminium; Bambus; Messing; Ahornholz; Birnbaumholz; Polycarbonat; Harz; Edelstahl; Sonstige
zh-CN: 琴格材质: ABS; 亚克力; 铝; 竹; 黄铜; 枫木; 梨木; 聚碳酸酯; 树脂; 不锈钢; 其他
fr: Matériau du peigne: ABS; Acrylique; Aluminium; Bambou; Laiton; Bois d’érable; Poirier; Polycarbonate; Résine; Acier inoxydable; Autre
sv: Kammens material: ABS; Akryl; Aluminium; Bambu; Mässing; Lönnträ; Päronträ; Polykarbonat; Harts; Rostfritt stål; Övrigt
ko: 콤 소재: ABS; 아크릴; 알루미늄; 대나무; 황동; 단풍나무; 배나무; 폴리카보네이트; 레진; 스테인리스 스틸; 기타
ja: コーム素材: ABS; アクリル; アルミニウム; 竹; 真鍮; メープルウッド; ペアウッド; ポリカーボネート; 樹脂; ステンレススチール; その他
vi: Chất liệu lược: ABS; Acrylic; Nhôm; Tre; Đồng thau; Gỗ phong; Gỗ lê; Polycarbonate; Nhựa resin; Thép không gỉ; Khác
pl: Materiał grzebienia: ABS; Akryl; Aluminium; Bambus; Mosiądz; Drewno klonowe; Drewno gruszy; Poliwęglan; Żywica; Stal nierdzewna; Inny
sl-SI: Material glavnika: ABS; Akril; Aluminij; Bambus; Medenina; Javorjev les; Hruškov les; Polikarbonat; Smola; Nerjavno jeklo; Drugo
es: Material del peine: ABS; Acrílico; Aluminio; Bambú; Latón; Madera de arce; Madera de peral; Policarbonato; Resina; Acero inoxidable; Otro
ru: Материал гребня: ABS; Акрил; Алюминий; Бамбук; Латунь; Древесина клена; Древесина груши; Поликарбонат; Смола; Нержавеющая сталь; Другое
th: วัสดุของหวี: ABS; อะคริลิก; อะลูมิเนียม; ไม้ไผ่; ทองเหลือง; ไม้เมเปิล; ไม้แพร์; โพลิคาร์บอเนต; เรซิน; สเตนเลส; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Materialul pieptenului: ABS; Acrilic; Aluminiu; Bambus; Alamă; Lemn de arțar; Lemn de păr; Policarbonat; Rășină; Oțel inoxidabil; Altele
zh-TW: 梳子材質: ABS; 壓克力; 鋁; 竹; 黃銅; 楓木; 梨木; 聚碳酸酯; 樹脂; 不鏽鋼; 其他
el: Υλικό χτένας: ABS; Ακρυλικό; Αλουμίνιο; Μπαμπού; Ορείχαλκος; Ξύλο σφενδάμου; Ξύλο αχλαδιάς; Πολυανθρακικό; Ρητίνη; Ανοξείδωτο ατσάλι; Άλλο
fi: Kamman materiaali: ABS; Akryyli; Alumiini; Bambu; Messinki; Vaahterapuu; Päärynäpuu; Polykarbonaatti; Hartsi; Ruostumaton teräs; Muu
da: Kammateriale: ABS; Akryl; Aluminium; Bambus; Messing; Ahorntræ; Pæretræ; Polykarbonat; Resin; Rustfrit stål; Andet
bg-BG: Материал на гребена: ABS; Акрил; Алуминий; Бамбук; Месинг; Кленово дърво; Крушово дърво; Поликарбонат; Смола; Неръждаема стомана; Друго
cs: Materiál hřebenu: ABS; Akryl; Hliník; Bambus; Mosaz; Javorové dřevo; Hruškové dřevo; Polykarbonát; Pryskyřice; Nerezová ocel; Ostatní
it: Materiale del pettine: ABS; Acrilico; Alluminio; Bambù; Ottone; Legno di acero; Legno di pero; Policarbonato; Resina; Acciaio inossidabile; Altro
pt-BR: Material do pente: ABS; Acrílico; Alumínio; Bambu; Latão; Madeira de bordo; Madeira de pereira; Policarbonato; Resina; Aço inoxidável; Outro
hu: Fésű anyaga: ABS; Akril; Alumínium; Bambusz; Sárgaréz; Juharfa; Körtefa; Polikarbonát; Műgyanta; Rozsdamentes acél; Egyéb
lt-LT: Šukų medžiaga: ABS; Akrilas; Aliuminis; Bambukas; Žalvaris; Klevo mediena; Kriaušės mediena; Polikarbonatas; Derva; Nerūdijantysis plienas; Kita
hr-HR: Materijal češlja: ABS; Akril; Aluminij; Bambus; Mjed; Javorovo drvo; Kruškovo drvo; Polikarbonat; Smola; Nehrđajući čelik; Ostalo
nb: Materiale i kam: ABS; Akryl; Aluminium; Bambus; Messing; Lønnetre; Pæretre; Polykarbonat; Resin; Rustfritt stål; Annet